Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.820

The Evergreen State College—Trustees—Appointment—Terms.

The terms of office and date of commencement thereof of the five member board of trustees of The Evergreen State College appointed by the governor prior to August 1, 1967, shall be the same as prescribed by law for trustees of state colleges under RCW 28B.40.100, as now or hereafter amended, except that initial appointments shall be for terms as follows: One for two years, one for three years, one for four years, one for five years, and one for six years.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.820. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.81.620.]